Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-409
Fugitive; warrant for arrest and return; effect.

If any person charged with an offense shall abscond or remove from the county in which such offense is alleged to have been committed, it shall be lawful for any magistrate of the county in which such person may be found to issue a warrant for the arrest and removal of such person to the county in which the offense is alleged to have been committed, to be there delivered to any magistrate of such county, who shall cause the person so delivered to be dealt with according to law; and the warrant so issued shall have the same force and effect as if issued from the county in which such offense is alleged to have been committed.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 291, p. 791;

R.S.1913, § 8945;

C.S.1922, § 9969;

C.S.1929, § 29-409;

R.S.1943, § 29-409.